Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-428.01
Rural emergency hospital, defined.

Rural emergency hospital means a facility that:

(1) Meets the eligibility requirements described in section 71-477;

(2) Provides rural emergency hospital services;

(3) Maintains an emergency department to provide rural emergency hospital services in the facility twenty-four hours per day that is staffed twenty-four hours per day and seven days per week, with a physician, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, or physician assistant;

(4) Has a transfer agreement in effect with a comprehensive level trauma center or an advanced level trauma center as defined in the Statewide Trauma System Act and any other transfer agreement necessary for patient care; and

(5) Meets such other requirements as the department finds necessary in the interest of the health and safety of individuals who are provided rural emergency hospital services and to implement licensure under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act that satisfies requirements for reimbursement by federal health care programs as a rural emergency hospital.

Laws 2022, LB697, § 3.

Statewide Trauma System Act, see section 71-8201.